Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2501
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-2501 to 38-2531 shall be known and may be cited as the Occupational Therapy Practice Act.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 29;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 138;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 120;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-6101;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 841;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 3.